en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.aff
FLAG long
SFX EB Y 48
SFX EB e able [^acegilotu]e 
SFX EB 0 able [acegilou]e 
SFX EB te ble ate 
SFX EB e able [^a]te 
SFX EB 0 bable [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX EB 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX EB 0 dable [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX EB 0 fable [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX EB 0 gable [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX EB 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX EB 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX EB 0 mable [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX EB 0 nable [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX EB 0 pable [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX EB 0 rable [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX EB 0 sable [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX EB 0 table [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX EB 0 vable [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX EB 0 zable [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX EB 0 able [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EB 0 able [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EB y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX EB 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX EB 0 able [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX EB e ability [^acegilotu]e 
SFX EB 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX EB te bility ate 
SFX EB e ability [^a]te 
SFX EB 0 bability [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX EB 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX EB 0 dability [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX EB 0 fability [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX EB 0 gability [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX EB 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX EB 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX EB 0 mability [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX EB 0 nability [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX EB 0 pability [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX EB 0 rability [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX EB 0 sability [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX EB 0 tability [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX EB 0 vability [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX EB 0 zability [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX EB 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EB 0 ability [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EB y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX EB 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX EB 0 ability [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy] 
SFX E7 Y 9
SFX E7 e able [acegilou]e 
SFX E7 0 able [^acegilou]e 
SFX E7 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX E7 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX E7 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX E7 0 able [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX E7 y iable [^aeiou]y 
SFX E7 0 able [aeiou]y 
SFX E7 0 able [^cely] 
SFX Eg Y 9
SFX Eg e ability [^acegilou]e 
SFX Eg 0 ability [acegilou]e 
SFX Eg 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Eg 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Eg 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX Eg 0 ability [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX Eg y iability [^aeiou]y 
SFX Eg 0 ability [aeiou]y 
SFX Eg 0 ability [^cely] 
SFX El Y 9
SFX El e ably [^acegilou]e 
SFX El 0 ably [acegilou]e 
SFX El 0 kably [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX El 0 lably [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX El 0 ably [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX El 0 ably [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX El y iably [^aeiou]y 
SFX El 0 ably [aeiou]y 
SFX El 0 ably [^cely] 
SFX Eb Y 3
SFX Eb e ible [^aeiou]e 
SFX Eb 0 ible [aeiou]e 
SFX Eb 0 ible [^e] 
SFX EL Y 12
SFX EL 0 ament m 
SFX EL y iment [^aeiou]y 
SFX EL 0 ment [aeiou]y 
SFX EL 0 ment [^my] 
SFX EL 0 aments m 
SFX EL y iments [^aeiou]y 
SFX EL 0 ments [aeiou]y 
SFX EL 0 ments [^my] 
SFX EL 0 ament's m 
SFX EL y iment's [^aeiou]y 
SFX EL 0 ment's [aeiou]y 
SFX EL 0 ment's [^my] 
SFX EZ Y 22
SFX EZ e y [^aeiouy]e 
SFX EZ 0 y [aeiouy]e 
SFX EZ 0 ey [aiouy] 
SFX EZ 0 by [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX EZ 0 ky [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX EZ 0 dy [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX EZ 0 fy [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX EZ 0 gy [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX EZ 0 ky [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX EZ 0 ly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX EZ 0 my [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX EZ 0 ny [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX EZ 0 py [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX EZ 0 ry [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX EZ 0 sy [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX EZ 0 ty [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX EZ 0 vy [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX EZ 0 zy [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX EZ 0 y [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX EZ 0 y [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EZ 0 y [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX EZ 0 y [^aebcdfgiklmnoprstuvyz] 
SFX E2 Y 21
SFX E2 e iness [^aeiouy]e 
SFX E2 0 iness [aeiouy]e 
SFX E2 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX E2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX E2 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX E2 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX E2 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX E2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX E2 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX E2 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX E2 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX E2 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX E2 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX E2 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX E2 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX E2 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX E2 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX E2 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX E2 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX E2 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX E2 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX Ez Y 24
SFX Ez e ily [^aeiouy]e 
SFX Ez 0 ily [aeiouy]e 
SFX Ez 0 ily [aiou]y 
SFX Ez ey ily ey 
SFX Ez y ily [^aeiou]y 
SFX Ez 0 bily [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX Ez 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX Ez 0 dily [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX Ez 0 fily [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX Ez 0 gily [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX Ez 0 kily [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX Ez 0 lily [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX Ez 0 mily [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX Ez 0 nily [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX Ez 0 pily [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX Ez 0 rily [^aeio][aiou]r 
SFX Ez 0 sily [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX Ez 0 tily [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX Ez 0 vily [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX Ez 0 zily [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX Ez 0 ily [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX Ez 0 ily [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX Ez 0 ily [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX Ez 0 ily [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX Ey Y 15
SFX Ey e ory te 
SFX Ey e atory [mr]e 
SFX Ey e ary se 
SFX Ey 0 ry [^mrst]e 
SFX Ey 0 ory [^aeous]t 
SFX Ey 0 ry [aeous]t 
SFX Ey 0 ery h 
SFX Ey 0 atory [^i]m 
SFX Ey im matory im 
SFX Ey 0 ory s 
SFX Ey 0 ary ion 
SFX Ey 0 ry [^i]on 
SFX Ey 0 nery [aiu]n 
SFX Ey 0 ry [^aiou]n 
SFX Ey 0 ry [^ehmstn] 
SFX EO Y 12
SFX EO 0 l a 
SFX EO e al [^bcgv]e 
SFX EO e ial [bcgv]e 
SFX EO 0 ial [bcrx] 
SFX EO um al um 
SFX EO 0 al [^u]m 
SFX EO y al ty 
SFX EO y ial [^t]y 
SFX EO 0 ual [px]t 
SFX EO 0 tal [iu]t 
SFX EO 0 al [^ipux]t 
SFX EO 0 al [^aebcrtxmy] 
SFX Eo Y 12
SFX Eo 0 lly a 
SFX Eo e ally [^bcgv]e 
SFX Eo e ially [bcgv]e 
SFX Eo 0 ially [bcrx] 
SFX Eo um ally um 
SFX Eo 0 ally [^u]m 
SFX Eo y ally ty 
SFX Eo y ially [^t]y 
SFX Eo 0 ually [px]t 
SFX Eo 0 tally [iu]t 
SFX Eo 0 ally [^ipux]t 
SFX Eo 0 ally [^aebcrtxmy] 
SFX EW Y 21
SFX EW ce tific ce 
SFX EW e atic me 
SFX EW se tic se 
SFX EW le ic ble 
SFX EW e ic [^b]le 
SFX EW e ic [^clms]e 
SFX EW 0 lic [ay]l 
SFX EW 0 ic [^ay]l 
SFX EW us ic us 
SFX EW 0 tic [^u]s 
SFX EW er ric er 
SFX EW 0 ic [^e]r 
SFX EW 0 atic [aeiou]m 
SFX EW 0 ic [^aeiou]m 
SFX EW 0 tic ma 
SFX EW a ic [^m]a 
SFX EW y etic thy 
SFX EW y ic [^t]hy 
SFX EW y tic sy 
SFX EW y ic [^hs]y 
SFX EW 0 ic [^aelmrsy] 
SFX Ew Y 9
SFX Ew e ical e 
SFX Ew er rical er 
SFX Ew 0 ical [^e]r 
SFX Ew 0 atical [aeiou]m 
SFX Ew 0 ical [^aeiou]m 
SFX Ew 0 tical ma 
SFX Ew a ical [^m]a 
SFX Ew y ical y 
SFX Ew 0 ical [^aemry] 
SFX E1 Y 9
SFX E1 e ically e 
SFX E1 er rically er 
SFX E1 0 ically [^e]r 
SFX E1 0 atically [aeiou]m 
SFX E1 0 ically [^aeiou]m 
SFX E1 0 tically ma 
SFX E1 a ically [^m]a 
SFX E1 y ically y 
SFX E1 0 ically [^aemry] 
SFX E3 Y 21
SFX E3 e ist [^aceiou]e 
SFX E3 ce tist ce 
SFX E3 0 ist [aeiou]e 
SFX E3 y ist [^aeioubp]y 
SFX E3 0 ist [aeioubp]y 
SFX E3 o ist o 
SFX E3 0 ists [^eoy] 
SFX E3 e ists [^aceiou]e 
SFX E3 ce tists ce 
SFX E3 0 ists [aeiou]e 
SFX E3 y ists [^aeioubp]y 
SFX E3 0 ists [aeioubp]y 
SFX E3 o ists o 
SFX E3 0 ists [^eoy] 
SFX E3 e ist's [^aceiou]e 
SFX E3 ce tist's ce 
SFX E3 0 ist's [aeiou]e 
SFX E3 y ist's [^aeioubp]y 
SFX E3 0 ist's [aeioubp]y 
SFX E3 o ist's o 
SFX E3 0 ist's [^eoy] 


#
# german S/PFXes
#

# this is the affix file of the de_DE Hunspell dictionary
# derived from the igerman98 dictionary
#
# Version: 20101229 (build 20101229)
#
# Copyright (C) 1998-2010 Bjoern Jacke <bjoern@j3e.de>
#
# License: GPLv2, GPLv3 or OASIS distribution license agreement
# There should be a copy of both of this licenses included
# with every distribution of this dictionary. Modified
# versions using the GPL may only include the GPL

PFX DU Y 1
PFX DU 0 un       .

PFX DV Y 1
PFX DV 0 ver      .
