en-de-multispell/dictionaries/en-DE.dic
adore/ElERESENEnEGEkED
advertise/ELEJ
afford/ESEGEBED
allegory/E1EMEWESE3Ew
ambrosia/EMESEo
ante/EMEW
anthropology/E3E1EwEMES
appoint/ERELESEVEDEG
archdeacon/EyEMES
astrology/EwE1EMESE3
atone/ESEoELEDEG
attack/ERESEDEGE7EM
aufgelöst/DADCDU
autobiography/EME1ESEwEW
autonomy/ESEMEW
avail/EBElESEDEG
avert/EGEbESED
axiology/EME1Ew
bas/ESEdE1Eo
bedevil/ELEDEGES
bee/ERESEyEM
begleitet/DADU
besorgt/DADCDU
blood/EzEhEpE2EMEDEiEZEGES
botany/E3EWESEMEwE1
bot/DVDZ
brood/EGEME2EZERESEDEk
bump/EDEREGEZESE2
Ca/Ey
cage/EGEDEzERE2EMES
calligraphy/ESE3EMEW
cartography/EWESEM
certify/ENERElE7EDEGEnES
chemist/Ey
chew/EGEREZE2ESE7ED
chore/EMEoEDESEG
chroma/EME1
chub/ESEMEZE2
Clare/EMEZ
classical/E3
cloud/EpEZE2ESEMEDEGEz
coerce/EREDEbEGES
collect/EbESEiEvEDEVE7EhEG
commerce/EGEoESEDEM
commit/ENELESEoEXEDEG
compute/EDEREGEnENElESEB
confer/E7EDEgEGERES
congratulate/EDESEGEnEyEN
connect/EvEiEVEbEGEhEDES
conspirator/ESEoEM
construe/EDESE7EG
contortion/EME3ES
control/EBEREMESElEG
controvert/EDEGESEb
counter-inflation/Ey
criminology/E3EwEMES
croak/EREDEZESEG
crust/EMEGEZEzESE2ED
cryptology/EME3EWEw
cuddle/EDE2EGEYES
cur/ErEYEgEvEZElE7EdESEMEV
czar/E3EMES
decompose/EB
deduct/Eb
deny/EDERE7EkEGES
depart/ELEG
depend/EBESEDEGEl
dermatology/E3ESEMEw
detest/ElEnE7EN
differentiate/ESEGEnEBEDEN
discourage/ELEDEGEk
dispense/EREyEGEnEDES
distanziert/DADCDU
dogma/E1EMESEW
dough/EMEZES
duften/DDDIDVDXDY
dye/E7EGEDEREJEMES
dysfunction/EoESEM
egoist/ESEMEWEwE1
egotist/EWESE1EMEw
embarrass/EkELEDEhESEG
encode/EJEDERESEBEG
encyst/EGELEDES
enjoy/EGELEBESEDEl
enmesh/ELEDESEG
entrench/ELEDESEG
epidemiology/ESEME3E1Ew
epistemology/E1EwEM
eras/E7EgESErEd
erdenkbar/DADU
erode/EVEDEuENEGExEXESEb
errata/ESEWEME1
excise/EGEDESEMENEBEX
expiate/EGEyENEnESED
expire/EyEnEDESEZEGEN
extreme/EPETEYE3ES
fall/EREbEMEGES
falsify/EREBEGEnEDESEN
fame/EMEDESEz
fat/ESEoEYEPETEMEGEZEDE2
fecund/EnEg
f/EFE7
fetishist/EW
floss/DVDZ
foam/EDEZESEME2EG
forgive/EREPElESE7EkEG
frankiert/DADU
friction/EoEMESEp
fun/EMEzE2EZ
geheizt/DADU
genealogy/EwE3E1EMES
geniert/DADU
geschönt/DADU
gezügelt/DADU
glaciology/EME3Ew
gloss/EDEMEZEGESEzE2
griff/DVDZDkDe
grouch/E2EZEDESEzEG
grump/E2EMEZESEz
habit/E7EnEdEgESEM
harlot/EyESEM
health/EME6EjEzESE2EZ
hero/EWE1EM
history/ESEKE1EMEW
hold/ERESEGEJE7
horology/EWE3EwESEM
hüten/DDDIDVDXDY
hydrology/EME3E1ESEw
impasse/EMEuElEXEbEN
imperfect/EgEVEP
impress/EXEVELEbENEvEu
ingest/EDEGEbEVES
inst/Eg
insurgence/EZESEM
intention/EDESEoEM
interoperate/EBEDENESEG
ionosphere/ESEMEW
isomorph/EWEME1
itch/EGEME2EZEzEDES
jerk/EzEGEZESEDE2
juggle/EREyESEDEG
knowledge/ESElEM
krampfen/DDDIDVDXDY
laud/ESElEDEGE7
ließ/DEDVDZ
liturgy/ESE3EME1Ew
love/EpEMEkE7ERESEYElEDEG
manage/ELEaEDEGES
mange/EMEZERESE2
manoeuvre/ESEBEMEGEDEJ
marsh/EMEZESE2
mäßig/DADCDU
media/EoEMEn
melodrama/EWESEME1
mes/E2EDEZEzEG
metre/ESE1EWEw
mimic/EREDEGESEy
misc/Eb
misogyny/E3ESEM
mortgagee/ESEME7
myth/EMEWE1EwES
Napoleon/EWESEM
naught/EzE2EMEZ
neigen/DBDDDIDVDXDY
observe/EBExEkENERElEnESEDEG
octagon/EoEMES
orator/ESEwE1EM
palate/ESEgEoEM
paradox/EMEwE1EWES
park/EDEGEMESEZ
parquet/EdEyEMES
pathology/ESEME3EwE1
pentagon/EoESEM
perk/EDEzEGESEZE2
petrology/EMESE3Ew
pharmacology/E3EME1ESEw
phys/EwE1
pornography/EMESE1EW
pot/EREGE6ESEZE7EDEgEM
practice/ESE7EM
present/ENEnELEYERESE7ExElEDEG
presume/EvEDESEGEVEkEXENEl
profit/EMEpEgEdElE7ES
program/EBEREGESEJEDEM
psych/E1EGESEWEDEw
push/ESERE7E2EGEzEDEZ
radiology/EWE1E3EMEw
recession/Ey
recognise/EREBEGEDElES
record/EREJE3E7
recover/EgEdEZE7
reduce/ESEbEDEGEREnENEV
refine/ELER
refractometer/EWEMES
region/EoESEM
religion/E3ESEM
rely/EBElEWEGED
report/EhE7EG
reverse/EGEbEY
rinnen/DDDIDVDX
rogue/EyESEM
rühmlich/DADU
schläft/DVDX
schreiben/DDDIDVDXDW
scruff/E2EZESEMEz
sett/E7EREJEMEDESEG
sex/ESEzEGE3EpE2EZED
ship/EDE4EAELEGES
shudder/EdESEZ
sleep/ERE2EMEZEGESEzEp
snap/EZESERE2EGEDEz
spas/EW
specify/ESEBElE1EnEREDEWENEG
spectra/EoEM
sphere/EME1EWEwES
spielen/DBDDDIDVDXDY
sponge/EGEZEDERESE2EM
spring/EREZESEzE2EG
squeak/EREZESEGEMEDE2Ez
stocky/EYETEPE3
stodge/E2EMEZ
streichen/DBDDDIDVDX
submerse/ESEbEXEGEDEN
suit/EMElEdESEgE7
sulk/EGEZEzE2ESED
surmount/EGE7EDES
taxonomy/E1E3EwEWESEM
ten/ElESEHEgE7EM
tin/EDEGEZESEMEzE2
top/EMEWEwEGEpERE1EJEDES
tot/EDESEoEMEG
transfer/EDERE7ESEGEMEg
trend/EDEzEZE2EMESEG
trick/ESEGEDE2EMEzEZ
tyranny/E8ESEQE1EMEw
unfix/EGE7ED
us/ErESE7EdEgEl
vary/EBESEDElEGEkEh
verarbeitet/DADU
vest/EyESEDEGELEoEM
vis/EbENEX
vitriol/EMEW
wachsen/DDDIDV
wissenschaftlich/DADCDU
